lexicon/apertium-krc.krc.lexc
! Morphological Transducer for Karachay-Balkar

Multichar_Symbols

%<n%>                   ! Noun
%<v%>                   ! Verb
%<vaux%>                ! Auxiliary
%<np%>                  ! Proper noun
%<adj%>
%<adv%>
%<postadv%>
%<abbr%>                ! Abbreviation
%<post%>                ! Послелог
%<prn%>
%<det%>
%<cop%>
%<cnjcoo%>
%<qst%>
%<num%>                 ! Numeral
%<sym%>

%<pl%>                  ! Plural
%<sg%>                  ! Singular

%<nom%>                 ! Nominative
%<loc%>                 ! Locative
%<abl%>                 ! Ablative
%<dat%>
%<gen%>
%<acc%>

%<ord%>
%<dem%>
%<itg%>
%<ref%>
%<ind%>

%<ant%>
%<cog%>
%<pat%>
%<top%>

%<m%>
%<mf%>
%<f%>

%<tv%>
%<iv%>

%<pers%>
%<qnt%>
%<neg%>

%<subst%>
%<attr%>

%<px1sg%>
%<px2sg%>
%<px3sp%>
%<px1pl%>
%<px2pl%>
%<px3pl%>

%<pass%>
%<caus%>
%<coop%>

%<past%>
%<aor%>
%<imp%>
%<ifi%>
%<opt%>
%<fut2%>

%<p1%>
%<p2%>
%<p3%>

%<gna_perf%>
%<gna_after%>
%<gna_until%>
%<gna_cond%>
%<prc_cond%>            ! -сA
%<prc_perf%>            ! -Iб
%<prc_impf%>            ! -E
%<ger_past%>            ! -GAн
%<ger_pres%>            ! -учу
%<ger_aor%>             ! -Iр
%<ger%>                 ! -у
%<gpr_pres%>            ! -учу
%<gpr_past%>            ! -GAн
%<gpr_fut%>             ! -Iр
%<gpr_fut2%>            ! -RIK

%<guio%>
%<lpar%>
%<rpar%>
%<lquot%>
%<rquot%>
%<sent%>
%<cm%>

%{A%}
%{E%}
%{D%}
%{R%}
%{G%}
%{N%}
%{I%}
%{s%}
%{y%}
%{р%}
%{n%}
!%{н%}                  ! no longer needed
%{ъ%}
%{е%}                   ! In toponyms ending in -ск


! Harmony for numerals
%{а%}                   ! Back unrounded
%{э%}                   ! Front unrounded
%{о%}                   ! Back rounded
%{ү%}                   ! Front rounded

%{н%}
%{з%}
%{т%}


%{·%}
%{☭%}                   ! Yo ho an' a bottle o' ром
%{❗%}                    ! Here be monsters
%{ꚜ%}                   ! force back vowel harmony
%{ь%}                   ! force front vowel harmony

%-
%+

%>

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Root

Copula ;
Miscellaneous ; 
Conjunctions ;
Postpositions ; 
Pronouns ;
Determiners ; 
Numerals ;
Nouns ;
ProperNouns ;
Adjectives ;
Adverbs ;
Verbs ;
Interjections ;
Abbreviations ;
Punctuation ;
Guesser ; 
Digits ;
!Temp ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                       M O R P H O T A C T I C S                         !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

!==============================================================================!
!
!                               N U M E R A L S
!
!    WARNING: This section should not be modified without consultation.
!             Test cases are in dev/numerals.
!==============================================================================!

LEXICON CASE-ETC-NONOM

CASES-OBL ;
GENERAL-POSSESSIVE-ETC ;

LEXICON N-INFL-COMMON-NONOM

POSSESSIVES ;
CASE-ETC-NONOM ;

LEXICON SUBST-NONOM

N-INFL-COMMON-NONOM ;
PLURAL ; 

LEXICON SQRD

²%<num%>:2 # ;  ! Dir/LR
³%<num%>:3 # ;  ! Dir/LR
²%<num%>:² # ;
³%<num%>:³ # ;
%<num%>: # ;

LEXICON NUM

%<num%>: # ;
%<num%>%<subst%>%<nom%>: # ;
%<num%>%<subst%>:%- SUBST-NONOM ;
%<num%>%<subst%>: SUBST-NONOM ; ! Dir/LR

%<num%>%<ord%>:%-ч%{I%} # ;
%<num%>%<ord%>:%-чы # ; ! Dir/LR ! Use/Sub
%<num%>%<ord%>%<subst%>%<nom%>:%-ч%{I%} # ;
%<num%>%<ord%>%<subst%>%<nom%>:%-чы # ; ! Dir/LR ! Use/Sub
%<num%>%<ord%>%<subst%>:%-ч%{I%} SUBST-NONOM ;

!%<num%>%<coll%>%<advl%>:%-%{е%}в # ;
!%<num%>%<coll%>%<nom%>:%-%{е%}в # ;
!%<num%>%<coll%>:%-%{е%}в SUBST-NONOM ;

%<num%>%<percent%>:%% # ; ! Dir/LR
%<num%>%<percent%>:% %% # ; ! Dir/LR
%<num%>%<percent%>:% %% # ;
%<num%>%<percent%>%<subst%>%<nom%>:%% # ; ! Dir/LR
%<num%>%<percent%>%<subst%>%<nom%>:% %% # ; ! Dir/LR
%<num%>%<percent%>%<subst%>%<nom%>:% %% # ;

%<num%>%<percent%>%<subst%>:%%%{а%}%{н%}%- SUBST-NONOM ;
%<num%>%<percent%>%<subst%>:%%%{а%}%{н%} SUBST-NONOM ; ! Dir/LR
%<num%>%<percent%>%<subst%>:%%%{ь%}%{н%}%- SUBST-NONOM ; ! Dir/LR
%<num%>%<percent%>%<subst%>:%%%{ь%}%{н%} SUBST-NONOM ; ! Dir/LR

°С%<num%>:°С # ;
°С%<num%>%<subst%>%<nom%>:°С # ;
°С%<num%>%<subst%>:°С%{а%}%{н%}%- SUBST-NONOM ;
°С%<num%>%<subst%>:°С%{ь%}%{н%}%- SUBST-NONOM ; ! Dir/LR
°С%<num%>:ºС # ; ! Dir/LR
°С%<num%>%<subst%>%<nom%>:ºС # ; ! Dir/LR
°С%<num%>%<subst%>:ºС%{а%}%{н%}%- SUBST-NONOM ; ! Dir/LR
°С%<num%>%<subst%>:ºС%{ь%}%{н%}%- SUBST-NONOM ; ! Dir/LR
°С%<num%>:С # ; ! Dir/LR
°С%<num%>%<subst%>%<nom%>:С # ; ! Dir/LR
°С%<num%>%<subst%>:С%{а%}%{н%}%- SUBST-NONOM ; ! Dir/LR
°С%<num%>%<subst%>:С%{ь%}%{н%}%- SUBST-NONOM ; ! Dir/LR

С%<num%>:° # ; ! Dir/LR
С%<num%>%<subst%>%<nom%>:° # ; ! Dir/LR
С%<num%>%<subst%>:°%{а%}%{н%}%- SUBST-NONOM ; ! Dir/LR
С%<num%>%<subst%>:°%{ь%}%{н%}%- SUBST-NONOM ; ! Dir/LR

км:км SQRD ;
мм:мм SQRD ;
см:см SQRD ;
м:м SQRD ;

LEXICON LASTDIGIT

1:1%{э%}%{т%} NUM ; ! "бир"
2:2%{э%} NUM ; ! "эки"
3:3%{ү%}%{т%} NUM ; ! "юч"
4:4%{ү%}%{т%} NUM ; ! "тёрт"
5:5%{э%}%{т%} NUM ; ! "беш"
6:6%{а%} NUM ; ! "алты"
7:7%{э%} NUM ; ! "джети"
8:8%{э%}%{з%} NUM ; ! "сегиз"
9:9%{о%}%{з%} NUM ; ! "тогъуз"

LEXICON LASTDIGIT-REST

1%0:1%0%{о%}%{н%} NUM ; ! "он"
2%0:2%0%{а%} NUM ; ! "джыйырма"
3%0:3%0%{о%}%{з%} NUM ; ! "отуз"
4%0:4%0%{а%}%{т%} NUM ; ! "къыркъ"
5%0:5%0%{э%} NUM ; ! "элли"
6%0:6%0%{а%}%{т%} NUM ; ! "алтмыш"
7%0:7%0%{э%}%{т%} NUM ; ! "джетмиш"
8%0:8%0%{а%}%{н%} NUM ; ! "сексан"
9%0:9%0%{а%}%{н%} NUM ; ! "тохсан"

LEXICON POWERS
!%0:%0%{а%}%{н%} NUM ; ! "он"
%0%0:%0%0%{ү%}%{з%} NUM ; ! "джюз"
%0%0%0:%0%0%0%{э%}%{н%} NUM ; ! "минг"

LEXICON LOOP

%,:%, DIGITLEX ;
%.:%. DIGITLEX ;
%,:%, LASTDIGIT ;
%.:%. LASTDIGIT ;
%,:%, LASTDIGIT-REST ;
%.:%. LASTDIGIT-REST ;
%,:%, POWERS ;
%.:%. POWERS ;
      DIGITLEX ;
      LASTDIGIT ;
      LASTDIGIT-REST ;
      POWERS ;

LEXICON DIGITLEX

%0:%0 LOOP ;
1:1 LOOP ;
2:2 LOOP ;
3:3 LOOP ;
4:4 LOOP ;
5:5 LOOP ;
6:6 LOOP ;
7:7 LOOP ;
8:8 LOOP ;
9:9 LOOP ;

!==============================================================================!
!          N U M E R A L     L E X I C O N     E N D S     H E R E
!==============================================================================!


LEXICON CLITICS-NO-COP 

CLIT-QST ;
# ;

LEXICON CLIT-QST

%+мы%<qst%>:%>м%{I%} # ; 

LEXICON CLIT-COP

%+э%<cop%>%<aor%>: V-PERS-S1 ;

LEXICON CLITICS-INCL-COP         ! Can appear only after nominals
                                 ! (and only after some cases).
CLITICS-NO-COP ;
CLIT-COP ;

LEXICON CASES-OBL

%<gen%>:%>%{❗%}%{N%}%{I%} # ;
%<acc%>:%>%{N%}%{I%} # ;
%<dat%>:%>%{G%}%{ъ%}%{A%} # ;
%<dat%>:%>%{❗%}%{G%}%{ъ%}%{A%} # ; ! Use/Sub
%<loc%>:%>%{D%}%{A%} CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
%<abl%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}н CLITICS-INCL-COP ;

LEXICON CASES

%<nom%>: CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
CASES-OBL ; 


LEXICON ATTR-SUBST

%<attr%>: # ;
%<subst%>: CASES ;
%<subst%>%<pl%>:%>л%{A%}%{р%} CASES ;

LEXICON GENERAL-POSSESSIVE-ETC

%<gen%>%<subst%>:%>%{N%}ики%{n%} CASES ;
%<gen%>%<subst%>%<pl%>:%>%{N%}ики%>л%{A%}%{р%} CASES ;

%<loc%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}г%{ъ%}%{I%} ATTR-SUBST ;

LEXICON CASES-ETC 

CASES ;
GENERAL-POSSESSIVE-ETC ;

LEXICON POSSESSIVES

%<px1sg%>:%>%{I%}м CASES-ETC ;
%<px2sg%>:%>%{I%}нг CASES-ETC ;
%<px3sp%>:%>%{s%}%{I%}%{n%} CASES-ETC ;
%<px1pl%>:%>%{I%}б%{I%}з CASES-ETC ;
%<px2pl%>:%>%{I%}г%{ъ%}%{I%}з CASES-ETC ;

LEXICON ABESSIVE-POSTPOSITION

%+сыз%<post%>:%>с%{I%}з CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON LI-POSTPOSITION

%+лы%<post%>:%>л%{I%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON PLURAL

%<pl%>:%>л%{A%}%{р%} CASES-ETC ;
%<pl%>:%>л%{A%}%{р%} POSSESSIVES ;
%<pl%>:%>л%{A%}%{р%} ABESSIVE-POSTPOSITION ;

LEXICON FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION

PLURAL ;
CASES-ETC ;
POSSESSIVES ;
ABESSIVE-POSTPOSITION ;
LI-POSTPOSITION ;

LEXICON N1                                ! Standard noun

%<n%>%<attr%>: # ;
%<n%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;

LEXICON N2                                ! Noun with voicing block

%<n%>%<attr%>: # ;
%<n%>:%{·%} FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;

LEXICON Nouns
кюнбатыш:кюнбатыш N1 ; ! ""
джаш:джаш  N1 ; ! "boy, son"
къулакъ:къулакъ  N1 ; ! "ear"
чабакъ:чабакъ  N1 ; ! "fish"
механика:механика N1 ; ! ""
авиабаза:авиабаза N1 ; ! "авиабаза"
амортизатор:амортизатор N1 ; ! "тех. амортизатор"
атом:атом N1 ; ! "атом"
брага:брага N1 ; ! "брага"
гетман:гетман N1 ; ! "ист. гетман"
демобилизация:демобилизация N1 ; ! "демобилизация"
директива:директива N1 ; ! "директива"
индус:индус N1 ; ! "индус"
кириу:кириу N1 ; ! "IIанат. десна"
конфронтация:конфронтация N1 ; ! "конфронтация"
къуууш:къуууш N1 ; ! "IIIпреследование"
люстра:люстра N1 ; ! "люстра"
микробиолог:микробиолог N1 ; ! "микробиолог"
налмаз:налмаз N1 ; ! "алмаз"
орман:орман N1 ; ! "уст. лес" "forest, woods"
поэтика:поэтика N1 ; ! "поэтика"
репарация:репарация N1 ; ! "репарация"
скрипка:скрипка N1 ; ! "скрипка"
тайфун:тайфун N1 ; ! "тайфун"
техник:техник N1 ; ! "(-ги) техник"
углевод:углевод N1 ; ! "углевод"
фосфорит:фосфорит N1 ; ! "хим. фосфорит"
чучхур:чучхур N1 ; ! "водопад"
электричество:электричество N1 ; ! "электричество"
эфиоплу:эфиоплу N1 ; ! "эфиоп"
гамета:гамета N1 ; ! "" Loan/rus
кило:кило N1 ; ! "" Loan/rus
протестант:протестант N1 ; ! "" Loan/rus
экстремист:экстремист N1 ; ! "" Loan/rus
эмансипация:эмансипация N1 ; ! "" ! Loan/rus
реализация:реализация N1 ; ! "" ! Loan/rus
аберрация:аберрация N1 ; ! "" ! Loan/rus
экономика:экономика N1 ; ! "" ! Loan/rus 
система:система N1 ; ! "" ! Loan/rus 
масса:масса N1 ; ! "" ! Loan/rus 
офтальмолог:офтальмолог N1 ; ! "" ! Loan/rus 
иудей:иудей N1 ; ! "" ! Loan/rus 
национал:национал N1 ; ! "" ! Loan/rus 
альбом:альбом N1 ; ! "" ! Loan/rus 
телефон:телефон N1 ; ! "" ! Loan/rus 
мастер:мастер N1 ; ! "" ! Loan/rus 
доктор:доктор N1 ; ! "" ! Loan/rus 
салат:салат N1 ; ! "" ! Loan/rus 
коэффициент:коэффициент N1 ; ! "" ! Loan/rus 
турист:турист N1 ; ! "" ! Loan/rus 
секретарь:секретарь N1 ; ! "" ! Loan/rus 
хирургия:хирургия N1 ; ! "" ! Loan/rus 
артиллерия:артиллерия N1 ; ! "" ! Loan/rus 
гидрография:гидрография N1 ; ! "" ! Loan/rus 
декорация:декорация N1 ; ! "" ! Loan/rus 
санкция:санкция N1 ; ! "" ! Loan/rus 
авар:авар N1 ; ! ""
къыргъыз:къыргъыз N1 ; ! ""
уйгур:уйгур N1 ; ! ""
суу:суу N1 ; ! "вода" "water"
заран:заран N1 ; ! ""
ёмюр:ёмюр N1 ; ! "век"
зороастризм:зороастризм N1 ; ! ""
тохтаусузлукъ:тохтаусузлукъ N1 ; ! "" ! Der/sIzlIK
армаусузлукъ:армаусузлукъ N1 ; ! "" ! Der/sIzlIK
болумсузлукъ:болумсузлукъ N1 ; ! "" ! Der/sIzlIK
джыйгъычсызлыкъ:джыйгъычсызлыкъ N1 ; ! "" ! Der/sIzlIK
кечиусюзлюк:кечиусюзлюк N1 ; ! "" ! Der/sIzlIK
къылыкъсызлыкъ:къылыкъсызлыкъ N1 ; ! "" ! Der/sIzlIK
пахмусузлукъ:пахмусузлукъ N1 ; ! "" ! Der/sIzlIK
сюйюмсюзлюк:сюйюмсюзлюк N1 ; ! "" ! Der/sIzlIK
тюзсюзлюк:тюзсюзлюк N1 ; ! "" ! Der/sIzlIK
шарайыбсызлыкъ:шарайыбсызлыкъ N1 ; ! "" ! Der/sIzlIK
конурбация:конурбация N1 ; ! ""
сеть:сеть N1 ; ! "сеть"
айрымкан:айрымкан N1 ; ! "остров"
немчалы:немчалы N1 ; ! ""
хакъ:хакъ N2 ; ! "доля"
тегей:тегей N1 ; ! "Iкара осетинский"
хапар:хапар N1 ; ! "рассказ, повествование о чём"
акъыл:акъыл N1 ; ! "ум, разум, рассудок, сознание"
тогъай:тогъай N1 ; ! "окружность"
къуран:къуран N1 ; ! "Iсостав"
оноучу:оноучу N1 ; ! "советчик, наставник"
платформа:платформа N1 ; ! "платформа"
сынджыр:сынджыр N1 ; ! ""
катаклизм:катаклизм N1 ; ! ""
юлгю:юлгю N1 ; ! ""
кандидатура:кандидатура N1 ; ! ""
индуист:индуист N1 ; ! ""
мингджыллыкъ:мингджыллыкъ N1 ; ! ""
кёблюк:кёблюк N1 ; ! ""
саксон:саксон N1 ; ! ""
вице%-министр:вице%-министр N1 ; ! ""
ген:ген N1 ; ! "карач. сапётка"
координат:координат N1 ; ! "координата"
пакет:пакет N1 ; ! "пакет"
тёбе:тёбе N1 ; ! " холм"
орта% кюн:орта% кюн N1 ; ! "четверг" "Thursday"
грекли:грекли N1 ; ! ""
библнотекачы:библнотекачы N1 ; ! "библиотекарь"
дефтер:дефтер N1 ; ! "уст. тетрадь"
календарь:календарь N1 ; ! "календарь"
манси:манси N1 ; ! "манси нескл. м,"
тамакъ:тамакъ N1 ; ! "(-гъы) 1) горло, глотка, гортань"
чачырауукъ:чачырауукъ N1 ; ! "(-гъу) фурункул, чирей, нарыв; суу ~ волдырь"
баннер:баннер N1 ; ! ""
искорка:искорка N1 ; ! ""
парикмахер:парикмахер N1 ; ! ""
солдат:солдат N1 ; ! ""
штрафник:штрафник N1 ; ! ""
себеблик:себеблик N1 ; ! ""
хата:хата N1 ; ! ""
